Arkansas, session 2025, HB1450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-16-310 is repealed.
2-16-310. Annual report.
The State Plant Board shall make an annual report to the Governor, in
which report it shall give an account of the disposition of the
appropriations which may be made for the purposes of carrying out the
provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2103(d), concerning the annual report
prepared by the farm to school and early childhood education program
coordinator, is repealed.
(d) The farm to school and early childhood education program
coordinator shall:
(1) Prepare an annual report, in collaboration with
stakeholders, that details the program activities conducted in furtherance of
the following three (3) core elements of the farm to school and early
childhood education program:
(A) School gardens;
(B) Food, nutrition, and agriculture education; and
*CRH128*
02/11/2025 12:43:25 PM CRH128

HB1450
(C) Procurement of local farm or food products for school
meals and snacks; and
(2) Submit the annual report to the House Committee on
Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and to the Senate Committee
on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-23-1002(e)(2), concerning the annual
review and report on the Buffalo River Watershed Management Plan by the
Buffalo River Conservation Committee, is repealed.
(2) Conduct an annual review of the Buffalo River Watershed
Management Plan and include recommendations for updates of the plan and a
report on successes during the year, as identified by the committee, to be
submitted to the Governor;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-60-217 is repealed.
20-60-217. Reporting.
Annually, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall submit a
report on the operations, implementation, and administration of the State
Meat Inspection Program to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) Chair of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and
Economic Development; and
(3) Chair of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and
Economic Development.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 25-38-203(a)(11), concerning the annual
report by the Department of Agriculture of the department's expenditures and
accomplishments provided to the Governor, is amended to read as follows:
(11) Prepare and submit annually to the Governor a report of the
Department of Agriculture’s expenditures and accomplishments activities and
programs, including information from all entities boards and commissions
administered by the Department of Agriculture;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 25-38-203(a)(13), concerning the report by
the Department of Agriculture concerning certain boards and commissions, is
repealed.
02/11/2025 12:43:25 PM CRH128

HB1450
(13) Develop a report to be submitted each year on January 1 to
the Governor, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development, concerning the activities and programs of the:
(A) Arkansas Catfish Promotion Board;
(B) Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board;
(C) Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board;
(D) Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board;
(E) Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board; and
(F) Arkansas Beef Council.


























02/11/2025 12:43:25 PM CRH128